Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Uniform Minimum Training Standards for Firefighters

§ 45-11-201.
Legislative findings and intent; minimum standards for training.

The Legislature finds that the specialized and hazardous nature of fire fighting requires that fire fighters possess the requisite knowledge and demonstrate the ability to perform certain skills to carry out their responsibilities. The activities of fire fighters are important to the health, safety and welfare of the people of this state and are of such a nature to require education and training of a professional nature. It is the intent of the Legislature to require and provide minimum standards for training and to declare that the State Fire Academy is the principal facility for such purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 558, § 1, eff from and after Jan 1, 1991.

§ 45-11-203.
Employment of persons not completing training standards prohibited; training standards.

After January 1, 1991, no person shall be employed as a full-time fire fighter by any local government fire fighting unit for a period exceeding one (1) year, nor for a cumulative time exceeding two thousand eight hundred (2,800) compensated hours, unless that person is certified as completing the mandatory training requirements in subsection (2). Any state agency or political subdivision that employs a person as a fire fighter who does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section is prohibited from paying the salary of such person, and any person violating this subsection shall be personally liable for making such payment. The Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board may grant an extension to individuals employed within the guidelines as established by the board not to exceed an additional year. Fire fighters serving as full-time employees prior to January 1, 1991, in a local fire fighting unit shall not be required to meet the minimum requirements in subsection (2).

The uniform training standards for all paid fire fighters shall consist of satisfactory completion of a training program administered by the State Fire Academy or local governments that have the proper facilities and have been certified by the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board which shall utilize National Fire Protection Association fire service professional qualification standards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 558, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 529, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.